Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.604.050

Allowable uses of student personal information—Adaptive learning and customized education.

Notwithstanding RCW 28A.604.010 through 28A.604.060, nothing in this chapter is intended to prohibit the use of student personal information for purposes of:

(1) Adaptive learning or personalized or customized education;

(2) Maintaining, developing, supporting, improving, or diagnosing the school service provider's website, mobile application, online service, or application;

(3) Providing recommendations for school, educational, or employment purposes within a school service without the response being determined in whole or in part by payment or other consideration from a third party; or

(4) Responding to a student's request for information or for feedback without the information or response being determined in whole or in part by payment or other consideration from a third party.

[ 2015 c 277 s 6.]